Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 30 Jewelers’, Watchmakers’, and Silversmiths’ Liens

34-30-1.
Lien for alteration or repair work.

Every jeweler, watchmaker, or silversmith who shall alter, repair, or do any work on any article of personal property at the request of the owner or legal possessor thereof shall have a lien upon and may retain the possession of the article until the charges for the alteration, repairing, or other work have been paid.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 257, § 30, as enacted by P.L. 1919, ch. 1785, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 448, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-30-1

.

34-30-2.
Sale of property to enforce lien.

If the charge or charges remain unpaid for a period of one year or more any jeweler, watchmaker, or silversmith may sell the article at private or public sale, and the proceeds, after first paying the expense of sale, shall be applied in payment of the charge or charges, and the balance, if any, shall be paid over to the person at whose request the alteration, repairing, or other work was done.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 257, § 30, as enacted by P.L. 1919, ch. 1785, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 448, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-30-2

.

34-30-3.
Notice of sale.

Before the sale is held, notice in writing must be given to the person from whom the article to be sold was received, of the amount due for such alteration, repair, or other work, and the time and place of sale; if the residence of the person is known the notice must be mailed to his or her last known street address; but if it is unknown then the notice of the sale shall be published at least six (6) days previous to the sale in a newspaper, published in English, in the city or town in which the jeweler, watchmaker, or silversmith carries on business if the item to be sold has a fair market value in excess of one hundred dollars ($100).

Fair market value as used in this section shall mean the price a willing buyer would pay to a willing seller and which the seller would accept on the open market.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 257, § 30; P.L. 1919, ch. 1785, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 448, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-30-3

; P.L. 1988, ch. 178, § 1.